Washington statutes.
RCW 26.04.105

Preservation of copies of applications and licenses—County auditor.

The county auditor may preserve copies of marriage license applications submitted and marriage licenses issued under this chapter in the same manner as authorized for the recording of instruments under RCW 65.04.040.

[ 1985 c 44 s 1.]